test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VLONGVW_NoExtra_bingode_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     bingode: bingode
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1bingode: nibingode
     +Px2bingode: gibingode
     +Px3bingode: obingode
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     bingode+Dim: bingodeens
     bingode+Con: bingodeenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     bingode+Pos: bingodeim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     bingode+Pej: bingodeish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     bingode+Pos1Pl: bingodeinaan
     bingode+PosPl: bingodeiwaa
     bingode+PosObv: bingodeini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     bingode+Pret: bingodeiban
     bingode+VocPl: bingode***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     bingode+Obv: bingodean
     bingode+Pl: bingodeag
     bingode+Loc: bingodeing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1bingode+Dim: nibingodeens
     +Px1bingode+Con: nibingodeenh
     +Px2bingode+Dim: gibingodeens
     +Px2bingode+Con: gibingodeenh
     +Px3bingode+Dim: obingodeens
     +Px3bingode+Con: obingodeenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1bingode+Pos: nibingodeim
     +Px2bingode+Pos: gibingodeim
     +Px3bingode+Pos: obingodeim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1bingode+Pej: nibingodeish
     +Px2bingode+Pej: gibingodeish
     +Px3bingode+Pej: obingodeish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1bingode+Pos1Pl: nibingodeinaan
     +Px1bingode+PosPl: nibingodeiwaa
     +Px1bingode+PosObv: nibingodeini
     +Px2bingode+Pos1Pl: gibingodeinaan
     +Px2bingode+PosPl: gibingodeiwaa
     +Px2bingode+PosObv: gibingodeini
     +Px3bingode+Pos1Pl: obingodeinaan
     +Px3bingode+PosPl: obingodeiwaa
     +Px3bingode+PosObv: obingodeini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1bingode+Pret: nibingodeiban
     +Px1bingode+VocPl: nibingode***idig, idog***
     +Px2bingode+Pret: gibingodeiban
     +Px2bingode+VocPl: gibingode***idig, idog***
     +Px3bingode+Pret: obingodeiban
     +Px3bingode+VocPl: obingode***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1bingode+Obv: nibingodean
     +Px1bingode+Pl: nibingodeag
     +Px1bingode+Loc: nibingodeing
     +Px2bingode+Obv: gibingodean
     +Px2bingode+Pl: gibingodeag
     +Px2bingode+Loc: gibingodeing
     +Px3bingode+Obv: obingodean
     +Px3bingode+Pl: obingodeag
     +Px3bingode+Loc: obingodeing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     bingode+Dim+Pos: bingodeensim
     bingode+Con+Pos: bingodeenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     bingode+Dim+Pej: bingodeensish
     bingode+Con+Pej: bingodeenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     bingode+Dim+Pos1Pl: bingodeensinaan
     bingode+Dim+PosPl: bingodeensiwaa
     bingode+Dim+PosObv: bingodeensini
     bingode+Con+Pos1Pl: bingodeenhinaan
     bingode+Con+PosPl: bingodeenhiwaa
     bingode+Con+PosObv: bingodeenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     bingode+Dim+Pret: bingodeensiban
     bingode+Dim+VocPl: bingodeens***idig, idog***
     bingode+Con+Pret: bingodeenhiban
     bingode+Con+VocPl: bingodeenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     bingode+Dim+Obv: bingodeensan
     bingode+Dim+Pl: bingodeensag
     bingode+Dim+Loc: bingodeensing
     bingode+Con+Obv: bingodeenhan
     bingode+Con+Pl: bingodeenhag
     bingode+Con+Loc: bingodeenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     bingode+Pos+Pej: bingodeimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     bingode+Pos+Pos1Pl: bingodeiminaan
     bingode+Pos+PosPl: bingodeimiwaa
     bingode+Pos+PosObv: bingodeimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     bingode+Pos+Pret: bingodeimiban
     bingode+Pos+VocPl: bingodeim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     bingode+Pos+Obv: bingodeiman
     bingode+Pos+Pl: bingodeimag
     bingode+Pos+Loc: bingodeiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     bingode+Pej+Pos1Pl: bingodeishinaan
     bingode+Pej+PosPl: bingodeishiwaa
     bingode+Pej+PosObv: bingodeishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     bingode+Pej+Pret: bingodeishiban
     bingode+Pej+VocPl: bingodeish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     bingode+Pej+Obv: bingodeishan
     bingode+Pej+Pl: bingodeishag
     bingode+Pej+Loc: bingodeishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     bingode+Pos1Pl+Pret: bingodeinaaniban
     bingode+Pos1Pl+VocPl: bingodeinaan***idig, idog***
     bingode+PosPl+Pret: bingodeiwaaiban
     bingode+PosPl+VocPl: bingodeiwaa***idig, idog***
     bingode+PosObv+Pret: bingodeiniiban
     bingode+PosObv+VocPl: bingodeini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     bingode+Pos1Pl+Obv: bingodeinaanan
     bingode+Pos1Pl+Pl: bingodeinaanag
     bingode+Pos1Pl+Loc: bingodeinaaning
     bingode+PosPl+Obv: bingodeiwaaan
     bingode+PosPl+Pl: bingodeiwaaag
     bingode+PosPl+Loc: bingodeiwaaing
     bingode+PosObv+Obv: bingodeinian
     bingode+PosObv+Pl: bingodeiniag
     bingode+PosObv+Loc: bingodeiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     bingode+Pret+Obv: bingodeibanan
     bingode+Pret+Pl: bingodeibanag
     bingode+Pret+Loc: bingodeibaning
     bingode+VocPl+Obv: bingode***idig, idog***an
     bingode+VocPl+Pl: bingode***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+VocPl+Loc: bingode***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pos: nibingodeensim
     +Px1bingode+Con+Pos: nibingodeenhim
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Pos: gibingodeensim
     +Px2bingode+Con+Pos: gibingodeenhim
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pos: obingodeensim
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos: obingodeenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pej: nibingodeensish
     +Px1bingode+Con+Pej: nibingodeenhish
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Pej: gibingodeensish
     +Px2bingode+Con+Pej: gibingodeenhish
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pej: obingodeensish
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pej: obingodeenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pos1Pl: nibingodeensinaan
     +Px1bingode+Dim+PosPl: nibingodeensiwaa
     +Px1bingode+Dim+PosObv: nibingodeensini
     +Px1bingode+Con+Pos1Pl: nibingodeenhinaan
     +Px1bingode+Con+PosPl: nibingodeenhiwaa
     +Px1bingode+Con+PosObv: nibingodeenhini
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Pos1Pl: gibingodeensinaan
     +Px2bingode+Dim+PosPl: gibingodeensiwaa
     +Px2bingode+Dim+PosObv: gibingodeensini
     +Px2bingode+Con+Pos1Pl: gibingodeenhinaan
     +Px2bingode+Con+PosPl: gibingodeenhiwaa
     +Px2bingode+Con+PosObv: gibingodeenhini
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pos1Pl: obingodeensinaan
     +Px3bingode+Dim+PosPl: obingodeensiwaa
     +Px3bingode+Dim+PosObv: obingodeensini
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos1Pl: obingodeenhinaan
     +Px3bingode+Con+PosPl: obingodeenhiwaa
     +Px3bingode+Con+PosObv: obingodeenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pret: nibingodeensiban
     +Px1bingode+Dim+VocPl: nibingodeens***idig, idog***
     +Px1bingode+Con+Pret: nibingodeenhiban
     +Px1bingode+Con+VocPl: nibingodeenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Pret: gibingodeensiban
     +Px2bingode+Dim+VocPl: gibingodeens***idig, idog***
     +Px2bingode+Con+Pret: gibingodeenhiban
     +Px2bingode+Con+VocPl: gibingodeenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pret: obingodeensiban
     +Px3bingode+Dim+VocPl: obingodeens***idig, idog***
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pret: obingodeenhiban
     +Px3bingode+Con+VocPl: obingodeenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Obv: nibingodeensan
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pl: nibingodeensag
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Loc: nibingodeensing
     +Px1bingode+Con+Obv: nibingodeenhan
     +Px1bingode+Con+Pl: nibingodeenhag
     +Px1bingode+Con+Loc: nibingodeenhing
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Obv: gibingodeensan
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Pl: gibingodeensag
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Loc: gibingodeensing
     +Px2bingode+Con+Obv: gibingodeenhan
     +Px2bingode+Con+Pl: gibingodeenhag
     +Px2bingode+Con+Loc: gibingodeenhing
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Obv: obingodeensan
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pl: obingodeensag
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Loc: obingodeensing
     +Px3bingode+Con+Obv: obingodeenhan
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pl: obingodeenhag
     +Px3bingode+Con+Loc: obingodeenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1bingode+Pos+Pej: nibingodeimish
     +Px2bingode+Pos+Pej: gibingodeimish
     +Px3bingode+Pos+Pej: obingodeimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1bingode+Pos+Pos1Pl: nibingodeiminaan
     +Px1bingode+Pos+PosPl: nibingodeimiwaa
     +Px1bingode+Pos+PosObv: nibingodeimini
     +Px2bingode+Pos+Pos1Pl: gibingodeiminaan
     +Px2bingode+Pos+PosPl: gibingodeimiwaa
     +Px2bingode+Pos+PosObv: gibingodeimini
     +Px3bingode+Pos+Pos1Pl: obingodeiminaan
     +Px3bingode+Pos+PosPl: obingodeimiwaa
     +Px3bingode+Pos+PosObv: obingodeimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1bingode+Pos+Pret: nibingodeimiban
     +Px1bingode+Pos+VocPl: nibingodeim***idig, idog***
     +Px2bingode+Pos+Pret: gibingodeimiban
     +Px2bingode+Pos+VocPl: gibingodeim***idig, idog***
     +Px3bingode+Pos+Pret: obingodeimiban
     +Px3bingode+Pos+VocPl: obingodeim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1bingode+Pos+Obv: nibingodeiman
     +Px1bingode+Pos+Pl: nibingodeimag
     +Px1bingode+Pos+Loc: nibingodeiming
     +Px2bingode+Pos+Obv: gibingodeiman
     +Px2bingode+Pos+Pl: gibingodeimag
     +Px2bingode+Pos+Loc: gibingodeiming
     +Px3bingode+Pos+Obv: obingodeiman
     +Px3bingode+Pos+Pl: obingodeimag
     +Px3bingode+Pos+Loc: obingodeiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1bingode+Pej+Pos1Pl: nibingodeishinaan
     +Px1bingode+Pej+PosPl: nibingodeishiwaa
     +Px1bingode+Pej+PosObv: nibingodeishini
     +Px2bingode+Pej+Pos1Pl: gibingodeishinaan
     +Px2bingode+Pej+PosPl: gibingodeishiwaa
     +Px2bingode+Pej+PosObv: gibingodeishini
     +Px3bingode+Pej+Pos1Pl: obingodeishinaan
     +Px3bingode+Pej+PosPl: obingodeishiwaa
     +Px3bingode+Pej+PosObv: obingodeishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     +Px1bingode+Pej+Pret: nibingodeishiban
     +Px1bingode+Pej+VocPl: nibingodeish***idig, idog***
     +Px2bingode+Pej+Pret: gibingodeishiban
     +Px2bingode+Pej+VocPl: gibingodeish***idig, idog***
     +Px3bingode+Pej+Pret: obingodeishiban
     +Px3bingode+Pej+VocPl: obingodeish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     +Px1bingode+Pej+Obv: nibingodeishan
     +Px1bingode+Pej+Pl: nibingodeishag
     +Px1bingode+Pej+Loc: nibingodeishing
     +Px2bingode+Pej+Obv: gibingodeishan
     +Px2bingode+Pej+Pl: gibingodeishag
     +Px2bingode+Pej+Loc: gibingodeishing
     +Px3bingode+Pej+Obv: obingodeishan
     +Px3bingode+Pej+Pl: obingodeishag
     +Px3bingode+Pej+Loc: obingodeishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     +Px1bingode+Pos1Pl+Pret: nibingodeinaaniban
     +Px1bingode+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nibingodeinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1bingode+PosPl+Pret: nibingodeiwaaiban
     +Px1bingode+PosPl+VocPl: nibingodeiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1bingode+PosObv+Pret: nibingodeiniiban
     +Px1bingode+PosObv+VocPl: nibingodeini***idig, idog***
     +Px2bingode+Pos1Pl+Pret: gibingodeinaaniban
     +Px2bingode+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gibingodeinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2bingode+PosPl+Pret: gibingodeiwaaiban
     +Px2bingode+PosPl+VocPl: gibingodeiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2bingode+PosObv+Pret: gibingodeiniiban
     +Px2bingode+PosObv+VocPl: gibingodeini***idig, idog***
     +Px3bingode+Pos1Pl+Pret: obingodeinaaniban
     +Px3bingode+Pos1Pl+VocPl: obingodeinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3bingode+PosPl+Pret: obingodeiwaaiban
     +Px3bingode+PosPl+VocPl: obingodeiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3bingode+PosObv+Pret: obingodeiniiban
     +Px3bingode+PosObv+VocPl: obingodeini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     +Px1bingode+Pos1Pl+Obv: nibingodeinaanan
     +Px1bingode+Pos1Pl+Pl: nibingodeinaanag
